Hawaii statutes.
[§196-10] Hawaii renewable hydrogen
program. There is established, within the department of business, economic
development, and tourism, a Hawaii renewable hydrogen program to manage the
State's transition to a renewable hydrogen economy. The program shall design,
implement, and administer activities that include:

(1) Strategic partnerships for the research,
development, testing, and deployment of renewable hydrogen technologies;

(2) Engineering and economic evaluations of Hawaii's potential for renewable hydrogen use and near-term project opportunities for the
State's renewable energy resources;

(3) Electric grid reliability and security
projects that will enable the integration of a substantial increase of
electricity from renewable energy resources on the island of Hawaii;

(4) Hydrogen demonstration projects,
including infrastructure for the production, storage, and refueling of hydrogen
vehicles;

(5) A statewide hydrogen economy public
education and outreach plan focusing on the island of Hawaii, to be developed
in coordination with Hawaii's public education institutions;

(6) Promotion of Hawaii's renewable hydrogen
resources to potential partners and investors;

(7) A plan, for implementation during the
years 2007 to 2010, to more fully deploy hydrogen technologies and
infrastructure capable of supporting the island of Hawaii's energy needs,
including:

(A) Expanded installation of hydrogen
production facilities;

(B) Development of integrated energy
systems, including hydrogen vehicles;

(C) Construction of additional hydrogen
refueling stations; and

(D) Promotion of building design and
construction that fully incorporates clean energy assets, including reliance on
hydrogen-fueled energy generation;

(8) A plan, for implementation during the
years 2010 to 2020, to transition the island of Hawaii to a hydrogen-fueled
economy and to extend the application of the plan throughout the State; and

(9) Evaluation of policy recommendations to:

(A) Encourage the adoption of hydrogen-fueled
vehicles;

(B) Continually fund the hydrogen investment
capital special fund; and

(C) Support investment in hydrogen
infrastructure, including production, storage, and dispensing facilities. [L
2006, c 240, §6]

Cross References

Hydrogen investment capital special fund, see §211F-5.7.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next